Maine, session 132, LD1092.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-A MRSA §1403-A, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Direct shipment of wine prohibited. Notwithstanding subsection 2, a winery
or small winery may not obtain a wine direct shipper license under this section if the winery
or small winery has an agreement with a wholesale licensee as provided under chapter 57.